Vermont statutes. TITLE 10A Vermont Fish and Wildlife Regulations
Subchapter 3. Quadrupeds

§ 31.
Seasons, bag limits.

The game animals specified in column one may be taken only during the period specified in column two not in excess of the numbers specified in column three and may be possessed only to the numbers specified as possession limit, except as provided in section
32 of this title.

Column One Column Two Column Three ANIMAL SEASON BAG LIMIT (a) Gray Squirrel September 1st to December 31st both dates inclusive 4 bag limit, 8 possession limit (b) Rabbit Last Saturday in September to second Sunday in March, inclusive WMUs D and E to
remain open through March 31 3 bag limit, 6 possession limit (c) [Repealed] (d) Caribou No open season Zero (e) Elk No open season Zero (f) Moose No open season except as established by Regulation of the Board

Click to view

HISTORY:
Added 1961 No. 119, § 2, eff. May 9, 1961; amended 1963, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. —, eff. Aug. 23, 1963; 1965, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. —, eff. Sept. 13, 1965; 1966, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. —, eff. Jan. 1, 1967;
1968, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. —, eff. Jan. 6, 1968; 1974, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 878, eff. Sept. 8, 1974; 1976, Fish and Game Board Reg. No.—, eff. Sept. 15, 1976; 1976, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 893, eff. Jan. 1, 1977;
1980, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 916, eff. July 2, 1980; 1980, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 919, eff. Aug. 16, 1980; 1989, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 978, eff. May 12, 1989; 1990, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 919, eff.
Aug. 24, 1990; 1993, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 999, eff. June 12, 1993; 2011, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 999, eff. January 1, 2013.

§ 32.
Trapping, hare and rabbits.

The Commissioner may issue a permit to no more than 5 members of any beagle club or to a private owner of an enclosed area not less than 20 acres in size, maintained for the training of beagles, to take live snowshoe hare and cottontail rabbits by the
method described in subsection (b) of this section.

Snowshoe hare and cottontail rabbits taken under a permit must be captured or trapped by means of a box or cage trap which will not wound the animal. Box or cage traps used for this purpose must be identified with an attached tag made of rustless material,
with the permit holder’s name and address permanently and legibly stamped or engraved thereon. Prior to setting any trap, the permit holder must obtain written permission from the owner of the property where the trap is to be set.
Said written permission, must accompany the application to the Commissioner for the trapping permit. The owner of the property may, at any time, revoke the permission. Any person who traps snowshoe hare or cottontail rabbits by
the permit shall visit his traps at least once in every twenty-four hours. The snowshoe hare and cottontail rabbits taken by such trap may be transported to the permit holder’s training area any time during the permit period and
must be released within twenty-four hours of taking. The permit must be carried on the permit holder’s person during transportation.

Snowshoe hare and cottontail rabbits taken by this permit are to be used solely for stocking of fenced beagle training areas. Any unauthorized use shall result in revocation of the permit by the Commissioner and shall be considered a violation of this
regulation.

The permit shall specify the time of year and number of snowshoe hare and/or cottontail rabbits to be taken.

HISTORY:
Added 1980, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 916, eff. July 2, 1980.

§ 33.
Moose Management Rule.

Authority.

This rule is adopted pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4081(a)
. In adopting this rule, the Fish and Wildlife Board is following the policy established by the General Assembly that the protection, propagation, control, management, and conservation of fish, wildlife and furbearing
animals in this State is in the interest of the public welfare and that the safeguarding of this valuable resource for the people of the State requires a constant and continual vigilance.

In accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4082
, this rule is designed to maintain the best health, population and utilization levels of the moose herd.

In accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4082
, the Vermont Fish and Wildlife Board may: establish open seasons; daily, season and possession limits for game; territorial limits; prescribe the manner and means of taking moose; establish territorial limits for
the taking of moose; and establish restrictions on taking based upon sex, maturity and other physical distinctions.

In accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4254(i)(1)
, this rule establishes a process to auction five (5) moose permits to be awarded to the highest bidders.

In accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4254(i)(2)
, this rule establishes a separate drawing for eligible Vermont veterans through a special priority drawing through the permit lottery system.

Purpose

The purpose of this regulation is to establish two annual moose seasons, to establish the procedures to be used in applying for and issuing moose permits, and to establish the administrative framework for regulating the taking of moose.

Definitions.

“Antlered moose” means a moose which has at least one antler 6 inches or more in length measured from the tip of the main beam along the distal edge of the antler to the base of the antler burr at the skull.

“Antlerless” means those moose without antlers or antlers less than six inches in length.

“Applicant” means a person who has submitted a completed legal application to the lottery.

“Application” means the form provided by the Department that allows a person to be entered into the lottery.

“Board” means the Vermont Fish and Wildlife Board.

[Repealed.]

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of the Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department.

“Crossbow” means a device consisting of a bow mounted to a rigid stock for discharging bolts or arrows and having a mechanical means to hold and release the drawn string, which must be fired from the shoulder. A bolt means a short projectile for a crossbow
that resembles an arrow and has a head that measures no less than 7/8 inch at its widest point. A crossbow shall have a minimum pull of 125 pounds, a working mechanical safety and a stock no less than 23 inches in length.

“Department” means the Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department.

“Either sex” means a moose of any sex.

“Guide” means a person authorized to accompany, direct, aid, assist, and/or instruct a Permittee during a moose hunt.

“Guide Permit” means a document, provided by the Department to the Permittee, to allow for a guide to assist in a moose hunt.

“Legal means” means the taking of a moose by muzzleloader, rifle, handgun, shotgun, a crossbow, or bow and arrow in conformance with this rule.

“Permit” means a document issued by the Department authorizing the taking of a moose.

“Permittee” means a person who has successfully acquired a legal permit through the lottery or auction as described in this rule.

“Subpermittee” means an individual designated by a Permittee, whose name has been provided to the Department in conformance with this rule, who may be permitted to take a moose.

“Wildlife Management Unit” (WMU) means one of twenty-five geographical areas in Vermont established for managing wildlife through regulation.

Moose Seasons

There shall be two moose seasons annually.

(b)
To take an animal during this season a person must possess a valid archery moose permit as prescribed in Section 9 of this rule.

Archery. The first moose season shall be by archery only:

This season shall be open for seven consecutive days, beginning the first day of October.

Regular. The second moose season shall be for any legal means of take. This season shall be open for six consecutive days beginning the third Saturday in October.

Possession Limit.

The bag limit for moose shall be one moose per moose hunting permit.

The possession limit for moose shall be one moose per moose hunting permit.

Permit Application Process

Applications must be made on an official moose hunting application form provided by the Department.

Only applications received by the Department’s central office during the official application period will be considered. Applications must be received prior to the deadline established by the Department.

The Department will consider only complete applications. For an application to be complete it must be legible, must contain all the information requested by the Department, must bear the applicant’s original signature, or, in the case of electronic or
facsimile applications, attestation under the pains and penalties of perjury. To be considered complete the form must be accompanied by any required application fee, or means of payment, such as a valid credit card payment.

The Department will consider no more than one complete application from any applicant per year for each of the two separate lotteries held. A lottery will be held for both the regular and archery seasons. Only one permit may be issued per person per
calendar year.

Ten (10) percent of the moose hunting permits may be issued to non-resident hunters.

No person who has held a valid Vermont moose hunting permit in any of the previous five (5) years may apply for a moose hunting permit or a bonus point in the current calendar year. The application of the five (5) year waiting period shall only be effective
for persons who hold a moose hunting permit after January 1, 2016.

[Repealed.]

Permit Selection Process.

All those who have submitted completed applications and who wish to be entered into the lottery will be entered into the lottery. The Department will hold, or cause to be held, a transparent, random drawing to include all persons who have submitted a
complete application.

Selected regular season applicants will receive a permit for their WMU of preference until the permit quota for their preferred WMU is filled at which time a permit will be awarded for their second choice WMU, and so on.

Selected regular season applicants will be notified by mail, and will receive a permit form to complete. Successful applicants have 15 calendar days to return the completed forms with the appropriate fee, and their Subpermittee’s name, if any.

Selected archery season applicants will be notified by mail, and will receive a permit form to complete. Successful applicants have 15 calendar days to return the completed forms with the appropriate fee and indicate the name of their Subpermittee, if
any.

Moose Hunting Permits

An applicant who is chosen by lottery, or is the successful auction bidder may purchase a moose hunting permit from the Department.

At the time of issuance, moose season permit recipients and designated Subpermittees must hold a valid Vermont big game hunting license.

At the time of issuance, archery season permit recipients and designated Subpermittees must show proof of having held an archery deer license and/or a certificate of satisfactory completion of a bowhunter education course from Vermont or another state
or province of Canada which is approved by the Commissioner. Archery season permit recipients and designated Subpermittees must hold a valid Vermont big game hunting license.

Moose hunting permits are valid only within the WMU or WMUs designated on the permit, for the specified season, and for the type (either sex, antlered, or antlerless) specified on the permit.

Deferments

The Commissioner may grant a one time, one-year deferment to successful applicants for reasons of personal or family illness, temporary disability, or military deployment.

Requests for deferment shall be made on the Department-issued form to the Commissioner and received no later than three days prior to the start of the moose season for which a permit has been issued. Requests shall contain information required by the
Commissioner to substantiate the request.

Deferred permits shall be issued for the same WMU and permit type (either sex, antlered, antlerless, archery or regular) as the originally issued permit.

Subpermittees

A person holding a valid moose hunting permit may designate one (1) Subpermittee who shall be permitted to hunt moose pursuant to the permit.

The Subpermittee must always be accompanied by the permit holder. For these purposes, “accompanied,” means being able to communicate without the aid of artificial devices except medically-prescribed eyeglasses or hearing aids.

Once the applicant has provided the name of their selected Subpermittee to the Department, no change to this selection will be allowed except for personal or family illness, temporary physical disability, or military deployment.

Any request for change of Subpermittee must be made in writing to the Commissioner and received no later than three (3) days prior to the start of the moose season for which a permit has been issued.

Subpermittee Ineligibility

No person who has held a Vermont moose hunting permit in any of the previous five (5) years may be designated as a Subpermittee in the current calendar year.

No person who holds a valid moose hunting permit in one year may be designated as a Subpermittee in the same year.

No person may be named as a Subpermittee on more than one permit during the same year.

Guides and Guide Permits.

The Guide shall be allowed to direct, aid, assist and instruct the Permittee and Subpermittee during the hunt.

A Guide may not carry any other firearm, muzzleloader, or archery equipment.

Each Permittee shall be issued a Guide Permit by the Department. The Guide Permit must be carried by the guide at all times while accompanying the Permittee while hunting moose.

A person serving as a Guide must hold a current valid Vermont big game hunting license.

A Guide Permit may be carried by different persons at any time during the moose hunt, but only one person at a time may serve as a Guide for each moose hunting party.

A person may simultaneously serve as a Guide for more than one moose Permittee but must be carrying the proper Guide Permit for each guided party.

Control Measures

In addition to all relevant laws and regulations pertaining to the hunting and taking of big game in Vermont, the following additional restrictions apply:

No persons other than the Permittee, Subpermittee and Guide shall participate in a hunt to take moose.

Portable radio transceivers, GPS, and/or cell phones shall not be used to communicate during the hunting or taking of moose. Such devices may be used, however, after the moose is legally tagged.

No electronic devices such as radio telemetry equipment shall be used to take moose.

No electronic devices may be used to attract moose.

No person shall shoot or attempt to shoot a moose when the moose is within 100 yards of any town, state, or federal highway as defined in 10 V.S.A. § 4705(f).

Pursuant to 10 V.S.A. App. § 12, notwithstanding 10 V.S.A. App. § 12, Section 1(g), a person may employ the licensed handler of an authorized leashed tracking dog to track a moose wounded while lawfully hunting under this rule.

Unless it is uncocked, a person shall not possess or transport a crossbow in or on a motor vehicle, motorboat, airplane, snowmobile, or other motor-propelled vehicle except as permitted in accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4705
.

Regular Season: Moose may be taken only with the following implements and restrictions:

Centerfire rifles or handguns not less than .25 caliber.

A muzzleloading firearm of not less than .45 caliber, with a minimum barrel length of 20 inches and designed to be fired from the shoulder, or a muzzleloading handgun of not less than .45 caliber and with a minimum barrel length of 10 inches.

Bows of not less than 50 pound draw weight, based on the archer’s normal draw length for traditional bows, and using arrowheads with a minimum of 7/8 of an inch in width with two or more cutting edges. A person taking moose may use a crossbow as a means
of take during any season that permits the use of a bow and arrow-only; and the crossbow is used in accordance with this subsection.

Shotguns not less than 20 gauge and utilizing slugs only.

Archery Season: Moose may be taken only with the following implements and restrictions:

Bows of not less than 50 pound draw weight, based on the archer’s normal draw length for traditional bows, and using arrowheads with a minimum of 7/8 of an inch in width with no fewer than two or more cutting edges.

Crossbow bolts shall have arrowheads with a minimum of 7/8 of an inch in width with two or more cutting edges.

No person taking moose may possess a firearm or muzzleloader while hunting moose during the archery season, except for a handgun in accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4252(b)
. No person taking moose may do so by means of firearms or muzzleloader in the archery season.

Tagging and Reporting

The transporting of moose shall be in accordance with current regulations and statutes pertaining to big game.

Once a moose is legally tagged, pursuant to 10 V.S.A. Appendix § 2a., there is no limit to the number of persons that can assist with the field dressing and removal of the moose from the kill site.

Moose taken under this rule must be reported, pursuant to 10 V.S.A. Appendix § 2, by exhibiting the eviscerated carcass, or parts thereof, to a Department official at a Department-authorized moose check station during its scheduled days and hours of operation
within 48 hours of tagging.

The moose head hide, lower legs, and boned-out ribcage and/or bones need not be reported, however, both complete central incisors must be presented.

The permittee shall bring the following to the biological check station:

The lower jaw, including incisors, one of which shall be taken for aging purposes;

The intact antler rack on an antlered moose;

The portion of the skull on a male antlerless moose where antlers would be attached;

The female reproductive tract including both of the ovaries;

The udder; and

All edible portions of the moose not including organs.

No moose shall be transported out of the State without first being reported as required herein.

The Permittee and/or Subpermittee must identify the exact kill site on a Department map, and if requested, shall be required to take Department personnel to the kill site and/or the site of carcass evisceration for purposes such as, but not limited to,
verification of the cause of death and site of kill, or to obtain ovaries or other biological samples left behind.

Permit Allocation

The number of either-sex and/or antlerless permits or bull only permits to hunt and take moose during both the regular and archery seasons will be set by the Board.

Special Priority for Eligible Vermont Veterans.

Pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4254
, eligible for Vermont veterans will receive special priority drawing in the regular moose season lottery drawing.

A total of five (5) regular season permits will be allocated for this special priority drawing. These five permits will be included in the total permits authorized by separate Board Rule.

Vermont residents who qualify for the special priority drawing must submit a complete application approved by the Department. A person applying for the special priority drawing permits must have marked the appropriate box on the application indicating
that they comply with the provisions of this section.

Vermont residents who qualify for the special priority drawing and who are not drawn for a moose permit in that special priority drawing shall be entered into the subsequent regular drawing.

Vermont residents who qualify for the special priority drawing and who do not receive a moose permit shall be awarded preference points for the subsequent special priority drawing.

Moose Permit Auction

Pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4254(i)
, five moose permits shall be set aside to be issued by auction. These permits are in addition to the permits authorized by separate Board rule.

Complete bids must be received by the Department’s central office prior to the deadline established by the Department.

Permits will be awarded to individuals that submit the five (5) highest bids. Individuals submitting the next five (5) highest bids will be eligible, in order of declining bid value, to receive a permit if higher-ranked bidders do not submit payment
within 15 calendar days following notification.

An individual may submit more than one bid; however he/she may only receive one moose permit. If an individual submits multiple bids, only the highest value bid will be included in the auction as an official bid.

Once notified of winning a moose permit, successful bidders have 15 calendar days to submit their bid payment, and to indicate: the season they will hunt in, the Wildlife Management Unit they will hunt in; and their Subpermittee, if any.

If an individual receives a moose permit from the regular moose lottery or archery moose lottery, and is also a successful auction bidder, the person may choose either permit. Should a person choose the regular moose lottery permit or the archery moose
lottery permit, the bid amount will be refunded and the next highest unsuccessful bidder will be offered the auction permit.

Individuals who have held a valid moose permit acquired by the regular or archery moose lottery or auction are ineligible from participating in the moose permit auction for five years.

HISTORY:
Added 1993, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 999, eff. June 12, 1993; amended 1994, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 999, eff. April 8, 1994; 1995 Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 999, eff. May 15, 1995; 1995, Fish and Wildlife
Board Reg. No. 999, eff. May 4, 1996; 1999, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 999, eff. June 5, 1999; 1999 (Adj. Sess.), Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 999, eff. June 16, 2000; 2003, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1000, eff. June
21, 2003; 2005, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 999, eff. Aug. 6, 2005; 2006 Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 999, eff. Aug. 31, 2006; 2007, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 999, eff. July 6, 2007; 2008, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg.
No. 999, eff. July 7, 2008; 2009, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 999, eff. June 18, 2009; 2010, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. eff. July 9, 2010; 2011, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. eff. March 3, 2011; 2012, Fish and Wildlife Board
Reg. eff. June 3, 2012; 2015, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. eff. January 1, 2016;

2019, No. 50
, § 6, eff. Jan. 1, 2020; 2019, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. eff. Jan. 1, 2020.

§ 33a.
Repealed. 2013, No. 78, § 3, effective July 1, 2013.

§ 34.
Repealed.

§ 35.
Taking of moose doing damage to fencing, tubing, or Christmas trees.

Only with prior approval from a Game Warden, a landowner may take a moose which has repeatedly or may continue to substantially damage:

tubing, fittings, and mainline used in maple sap collection.

fencing that is currently containing hoofed livestock.

Christmas Tree Plantations.

A landowner may designate one individual who holds a resident Vermont hunting license as an agent to take a moose doing damage, pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, on the landowner’s behalf. A landowner may not offer or accept any form of payment
to or from a person designated as an agent under this subsection except as allowed in subsection (e) of this section.

The landowner shall immediately report the wounding or killing of a moose under this section to a Game Warden. Within 12 hours of said wounding or killing of a moose under this section, the landowner or person who performed the act shall submit a written,
signed report relating the date, time, place and reason for the wounding or killing to a Game Warden.

A person who kills the moose shall immediately properly dress the carcass and care for the meat.

The Game Warden shall immediately investigate the case and if satisfied that the moose was taken as provided in this section, the Warden shall give the landowner a certificate of his or her finding in the matter. The certificate shall entitle the landowner
to the ownership of the carcass. The landowner may not sell or give away the carcass except to offer all or a portion of it to the agent designated under subsection (b) of this section as compensation for killing the moose. Any
carcass not desired for home consumption in the household of the certificate holder or designated agent shall be turned over to a Game Warden.

HISTORY:
Added 1996, Fish and Wildlife Commissioner’s Reg. No. 1013, eff. July 6, 1996.

§ 36.
Repealed. 2019 Fish and Wildlife Board Reg., eff. January 1, 2020.

§ 37.
Deer Management Rule.

Authority

This rule is adopted pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4081(b)
. In adopting this rule, the Fish and Wildlife Board is following the policy established by the General Assembly that the protection, propagation, control, management, and conservation of fish, wildlife and furbearing
animals in this State is in the interest of the public welfare and that the safeguarding of this valuable resource for the people of the State requires a constant and continual vigilance.

In accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4082
, this rule is designed to maintain the best health, population and utilization levels of the deer herd.

In accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4084
, this rule establishes open seasons; establishes daily, season and possession limits; prescribes the manner and means of taking white-tailed deer and establishes restrictions on taking based on sex and antler characteristics.

Purpose.

The purpose of this rule is to manage the white-tailed deer herd, implementing will of the General Assembly to design rules to maintain the best health, population and utilization levels of the deer herd.

Definitions

“Antlerless Deer” are defined as those deer without antlers or antlers less than three (3") inches in length.

An “Anterless Deer Permit” is a permit issued pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4081(g)
that allows a person to take one anterless deer during the anterless or muzzleloader seasons.

“Antler Point”: A “point” is an antler projection of at least 1" measured from the base of the point at the main beam to the tip of the point. A broken main beam shall count as a point regardless of length.

“Bait”: For the purposes of this regulation, ‘bait‘ is defined as any animal, vegetable, fruit or mineral matter placed with the intention of attracting wildlife. Natural and artificial scents and lures that are not prohibited under Section 14 of this
regulation and are not designed to be consumed by eating or licking shall not be bait for the purposes of this rule.

“Baiting” is the use of any animal, vegetable or mineral matter, including scents and lures prohibited under section 14 of this regulation that has the effect of enticing wildlife to a certain location.

“Board”: The Vermont Fish and Wildlife Board.

“Bona fide agricultural practices”: Practices that have been employed to plant, grow and harvest an agricultural product conducted in the usual manner.

“Crossbows”: A crossbow means a device consisting of a bow mounted to a rigid stock for discharging bolts or arrows and having a mechanical means to hold and release the drawn string, which must be fired from the shoulder. A bolt means a short projectile,
designed for a crossbow, that resembles an arrow. No person shall hunt wild animals or game with a crossbow if the bolt has an arrowhead less than seven-eighths of an inch at its widest point and has less than two sharp cutting
edges. A crossbow shall have a minimum pull of 125 pounds, a working mechanical safety and a stock no less than 23 inches in length.

“Legal Buck”: In Wildlife Management Units C, D1, D2 E1, E2, G, I, L, M, P, Q any white-tail deer with at least one antler three (3") inches or more in length; and in Wildlife Management Units A, B, F1, F2, H, J1, J2, K, N, and O a legal buck shall be
any white-tailed deer with at least one antler with two or more antler points one inch in length or longer.

“Novice”: A person who purchased their first hunting license within the past 12 months and is 16 years of age or older.

“Youth”: A person who is 15 years of age or younger.

Annual Deer Limit

A person shall not take more than four white-tailed deer in a calender year, only one of which may be a legal buck.

Youth and novice hunters shall be allowed to take two legal bucks, provided that one is taken during the youth or novice season, not to exceed the annual limit of four white-tailed deer.

Antlerless Deer Season.

For four consecutive days, commencing on the Thursday 16 days prior to the opening day of the regular rifle season shall be the antlerless deer season.

A person hunting under this section shall obtain a muzzleloader license as provided in

10 V.S.A. § 4252
and must possess an antlerless deer permit.

A person may take one antlerless deer per antlerless deer permit. A person may take additional antlerless deer if they obtain additional antlerless deer permits not to exceed the annual limit as prescribed in section 4.1 of this rule. No person may purchase
or possess more than one antlerless deer permit at a time, or purchase a subsequent antlerless deer permit until the person has harvested an antlerless deer. If a person possesses a permit to take an antlerless deer, then the
person may take an antlerless deer.

A person hunting with a muzzleloading firearm pursuant to this rule shall not carry any firearms other than one single-barreled muzzleloading firearm as defined in 10 V.S.A.§ 4001(33) while hunting deer during this season.

No person taking deer by means of muzzleloader may possess archery equipment or crossbow while hunting.

No person shall take a deer in a WMU unless they are licensed, permitted or explicitly authorized to do so by the Board rules, or procedures adopted in accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4082
(c).

Muzzleloading Season.

Muzzleloader Season: For the nine consecutive calendar days commencing on the first Saturday after the completion of the regular rifle deer hunting season, a person may take one legal buck by muzzleloading firearm.

One legal buck by muzzleloading firearm, provided that they have not yet taken a buck as prescribed in Section 4.1 of this rule, and

If the Board has authorized the taking of antlerless deer, and if a person possesses an antlerless deer permit, then the person may take an antlerless deer. No person may purchase or possess more than one antlerless deer permit and a person can only purchase
a subsequent antlerless deer permit after the person has harvested an antlerless deer, not to exceed the annual limit as prescribed in section 4.1 of this rule.

A person hunting with a muzzleloading firearm under this section shall obtain a muzzleloader license as provided in

10 V.S.A. § 4252
.

A person hunting with a muzzleloading firearm pursuant to this rule shall not carry any firearms other than one single-barreled muzzleloading firearm as defined in

10 V.S.A. § 4001(33)
while hunting deer during this season.

No person taking deer by means of muzzleloader may possess archery equipment or crossbow while hunting.

No person shall take a deer in a WMU unless they are licensed, permitted or explicitly authorized to do so by the Board rules, or procedures adopted in accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4082(c)
.

Archery Season

Archery Season: October 1 through December 15, except during the regular rifle deer hunting season:

One legal buck may be taken by bow and arrow or crossbow, during the archery season anywhere in the state; not to exceed the annual limit as prescribed in Section 4.1 of this rule, and

In Wildlife Management Units declared open by the Board to the taking of antlerless deer, a person may take antlerless deer.

A person hunting with a bow and arrow or crossbow under this section shall obtain an archery license as provided in

10 V.S.A. § 4252
. An archery license will be valid for one deer; additional archery licenses are required for the taking of additional deer.

The Board may establish Expanded Archery Zones

Within these zones, the archery season shall begin September 15. From September 15 to September 30, only antlerless deer may be taken.

[Zone Boundaries]

Crossbows may be used as a means of take during any season that permits the use of a bow and arrow.

The holder of an archery license or a super sport license, hunting with a bow and arrow or a crossbow, may possess a handgun while archery hunting, in accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4252(b)
, provided that the license holder shall not take game by firearm while hunting.

Unless it is uncocked, a person shall not possess or transport a crossbow in or on a motor vehicle, motorboat, airplane, snowmobile, or other motor-propelled vehicle except as permitted in accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4705
.

Regular Rifle Season

Pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4084
for the 16 consecutive calendar days commencing 12 days prior to Thanksgiving day, a person may take by lawful means one legal buck. No person shall take a deer in a WMU unless they are licensed, permitted or explicitly
authorized to do so by the Board rules, or procedures adopted in accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4082(c)
.

Youth Deer Hunting Weekend

Pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4742a
, the Saturday and Sunday three weeks prior to the opening day of the regular rifle deer hunting season shall be youth deer hunting weekend.

Limit: One white-tailed deer. One legal buck may be taken during the youth deer hunting weekend, or any deer if the Board has authorized the taking of antlerless deer during youth hunting weekend.

To participate in the youth deer hunt, a qualified youth must be 15 years of age or younger and have a valid Vermont hunting license and a youth deer hunting weekend license.

The youth must be accompanied by an unarmed adult who holds a valid Vermont hunting license and who is 18 years of age or older. An adult accompanying a youth under this section shall accompany no more than two young people at one time. As used in this
section, “accompany,” “accompanied,” or “accompanying” means direct control and supervision, including the ability to see and communicate with the youth hunter without the aid of artificial devices such as radios or binoculars,
except for medically necessary devices such as hearing aids or eyeglasses.

No youth shall hunt under this section on privately owned land without first obtaining the permission of the owner or occupant.

Novice Season

Novice Season: This season shall be concurrent with the Youth Deer Hunting Weekend as prescribed in

10 V.S.A. § 4742a
and section 9.1 of this rule.

Limit: One white-tailed deer. One legal buck may be taken during this season, or any deer if the Board has authorized the taking of antlerless deer during youth hunting weekend.

To participate in the novice season, a qualified person must have a valid Vermont hunting license, and follow the requirements of youth hunting week-end.

The novice hunter must be accompanied by an unarmed adult who holds a valid Vermont hunting license and who is 18 years of age or older. An adult accompanying a novice under this section shall accompany no more than two novice hunters at one time. As
used in this section, “accompany,” “accompanied,” or “accompanying” means direct control and supervision, including the ability to see and communicate with the novice hunter without the aid of artificial devices such as radios
or binoculars, except for medically necessary devices such as hearing aids or eyeglasses.

No Novice hunter shall hunt under this section on privately owned land without first obtaining the permission of the owner or occupant.

Reporting.

A deer carcass shall be field dressed prior to reporting in accordance with 10 V.S.A. App. § 2.

Upon request, the person harvesting a deer shall show and return to the kill site with a Game Warden.

Feeding of Deer.

No person shall feed white-tailed deer at any time in Vermont except:

Under a license or permit issued pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4152
by the Department for bona fide scientific research, mitigation of wildlife damage or nuisance problems, or wildlife population reduction programs only; or

By planting, cultivating or harvesting of crops directly associated with bona fide agricultural practices, including planted wildlife food plots; or

By distribution of food material for livestock directly associated with bona fide agricultural practices; or

By cutting of trees or brush; or

By incidental feeding by an elevated bird/squirrel feeders (feeders must be at least five feet above the ground) providing seed, grain, fruit, worms, or suet for birds or squirrels, located within 100 feet of an occupied dwelling.

Baiting

No person shall take deer by using bait. Exempted from this prohibition are:

Incidental feeding of wildlife within active livestock operations;

Standing crops planted and left standing as food plots for wildlife;

Grain or other feed scattered or distributed solely as a result of normal agricultural, gardening, or soil stabilization, and logging practices;

Vegetation or food/seed naturally deposited.

No person shall take any game or wild animal by using bait during deer seasons established under Part 4 of Title 10 or by rules of the Board, except that persons taking furbearers as authorized under

10 V.S.A. § 4252(3)
may use bait in conjunction with traps being set to take furbearers.

The Ban of urine and other natural lures.

Authority. The Fish & Wildlife Board finds that, in order to protect the health of white-tailed deer in Vermont, it is necessary to prohibit the use of cervid urine, blood, glands, gland oil, feces, or other bodily fluids for the purpose of taking
or attempting to take deer.

Restricted and Permitted Uses of cervid urine, blood, glands, gland oil, feces, or other bodily fluids.

No person shall possess while hunting or use, for the purposes of taking or attempting to take, attracting, surveillance or scouting deer; any product that contains or purports to contain any cervid urine, blood, gland oil, feces, or other bodily fluids.

A person may utilize the body parts of a wild Vermont white-tailed deer legally taken or acquired by that person for coyote hunting.

HISTORY:
Added 2005, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1502, eff. July 2, 2005; amended 2008 Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1502, eff. Sept. 6, 2008; 2011 Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1502, eff. Mar. 3, 2011; 2015 Fish and Wildlife
Board Reg., eff. January 1, 2016; 2019, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg., eff. Jan. 1, 2020.